tr: Buharlı pişirme tavası boyut uyumluluğu: Tam boy (1/1); Yarım boy (1/2); Dokuzda bir boy (1/9); Çeyrek boy (1/4); Altıda bir boy (1/6); Üçte bir boy (1/3); Üçte iki boy (2/3); Diğer
zh-CN: 蒸汽台托盘具尺寸兼容性: 全尺寸 (1/1); 半尺寸 (1/2); 九分之一尺寸 (1/9); 四分之一尺寸 (1/4); 六分之一 (1/6); 三分之一尺寸 (1/3); 三分之二尺寸 (2/3); 其他
en: Steam table pan size compatibility: Full size (1/1); Half size (1/2); Ninth size (1/9); Quarter size (1/4); Sixth size (1/6); Third size (1/3); Two-thirds size (2/3); Other
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost veličine posude za grijaće stolove: Puna veličina (1/1); Polovina veličine (1/2); Devetina veličina (1/9); Četvrtina veličine (1/4); Šestina veličine (1/6); Trećina veličine (1/3); Dvije trećine veličine (2/3); Ostalo
th: ความเข้ากันได้กับขนาดอ่างใส่อาหาร: ขนาดเต็ม (1/1); ขนาดครึ่ง (1/2); ขนาดหนึ่งในเก้า (1/9); ขนาดหนึ่งในสี่ (1/4); ขนาดหนึ่งในหก (1/6); ขนาดหนึ่งในสาม (1/3); ขนาดสองในสาม (2/3); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de tamanho da panela de mesa térmica: Tamanho inteiro (1/1); Metade do tamanho (1/2); Um nono do tamanho (1/9); Um quarto do tamanho (1/4); Um sexto do tamanho (1/6); Um terço doo tamanho (1/3); Dois terços do tamanho (2/3); Outro
vi: Khả năng tương thích kích thước khay hâm nóng: Kích thước đầy đủ (1/1); Kích thước một nửa (1/2); Kích thước một phần chín (1/9); Kích thước một phần tư (1/4); Kích thước một phần sáu (1/6); Kích thước một phần ba (1/3); Kích thước hai phần ba (2/3); Khác
ko: 스팀 테이블 팬 규격 호환성: 풀사이즈(1/1); 하프사이즈(1/2); 9분의 1 사이즈(1/9); 4분의 1 사이즈(1/4); 6분의 1 사이즈(1/6); 3분의 1 사이즈(1/3); 3분의 2 사이즈(2/3); 기타
ru: Совместимость гастроемкости по размеру: Полный размер (1/1); Половина (1/2); Девятая часть (1/9); Четверть (1/4); Шестая часть (1/6); Треть (1/3); Две трети (2/3); Другое
zh-TW: 蒸氣台餐盤尺寸相容性: 全尺寸 (1/1); 半尺寸 (1/2); 九分之一尺寸 (1/9); 四分之一尺寸 (1/4); 六分之一尺寸 (1/6); 三分之一尺寸 (1/3); 三分之二尺寸 (2/3); 其他
bg-BG: Съвместимост на размерите на съдовете за топла витрина: Пълен размер (1/1); Половин размер (1/2); Една девета (1/9); Една четвърт (1/4); Една шеста (1/6); Една трета (1/3); Две трети (2/3); Друго
pl: Rozmiary wkładów do podgrzewaczy żywności: Pełny rozmiar (1/1); Połowa (1/2); Jedna dziewiąta (1/9); Jedna czwarta (1/4); Jedna szósta (1/6); Jedna trzecia (1/3); Dwie trzecie (2/3); Inne
sk-SK: Kompatibilita veľkostí gastronádob: Plná veľkosť (1/1); Polovičná veľkosť (1/2); Devätinová veľkosť (1/9); Štvrtinová veľkosť (1/4); Šestinová veľkosť (1/6); Tretinová veľkosť (1/3); Dvojtretinová veľkosť (2/3); Iné
sl-SI: Združljivost velikosti parne namizne posode: Polna velikost (1/1); Polovična velikost (1/2); Deveta velikost (1/9); Velikost četrtine (1/4); Šesta velikost (1/6); Tretja velikost (1/3); Velikost dveh tretjin (2/3); Druga
ja: スチームテーブルパンのサイズ互換性: フルサイズ（1/1）; ハーフサイズ（1/2）; 1/9サイズ; 1/4サイズ; 1/6サイズ; 1/3サイズ; 2/3サイズ; その他
es: Compatibilidad del tamaño de las bandejas para mesas de vapor: Medida entera (1/1); Medida mitad (1/2); Medida noveno (1/9); Medida cuarto (1/4); Medida sexto (1/6); Medida tercio (1/3); Medida dos tercios (2/3); Otros
nl: Geschiktheid voor panmaten: Volledige maat (1/1); Halve maat (1/2); Negende maat (1/9); kwartaalmaat (1/4); Zesde maat (1/6); Derde maat (1/3); Twee derde maat (2/3); Overig
lt-LT: Šildomo maisto indo dydžio suderinamumas: Įprastas dydis (1/1); Pusės dydis (1/2); Devintadalio dydis (1/9); Ketvirtadalio dydis (1/4); Šeštadalio dydis (1/6); Trečdalio dydis (1/3); Dviejų trečdalių dydis (2/3); Kita
de: Größenkompatibilität des Behälters für Warmhaltetheken: Originalgröße (1/1); Halbe Größe (1/2); Neuntelgröße (1/9); Viertelgröße (1/4); Sechstelgröße (1/6); Drittelgröße (1/3); Zweidrittelgröße (2/3); Sonstiges
fi: Höyrypöytäpannun koon yhteensopivuus: Täysikokoinen (1/1); Puolikokoinen (1/2); Yhdeksäsosan kokoinen (1/9); Neljännesosan kokoinen (1/4); Kuudesosan kokoinen (1/6); Kolmasosan kokoinen (1/3); Kahden kolmasosan kokoinen (2/3); Muu
el: Συμβατότητα μεγέθους τραπεζιού ατμού: Πλήρες μέγεθος (1/1); Μισό μέγεθος (1/2); Ένατο μέγεθος (1/9); Τέταρτο μέγεθος (1/4); Έκτο μέγεθος (1/6); Τρίτο μέγεθος (1/3); Μέγεθος δύο τρίτων (2/3); Άλλο
it: Compatibilità taglia per tavolo vapore: Taglia completa (1/1); Mezza taglia (1/2); Nona taglia (1/9); Un quarto (1/4); Sesta taglia (1/6); Terza taglia (1/3); Due terzi taglia (2/3); Altro
nb: Størrelseskompatibilitet for dampbordpanne: Full størrelse (1/1); Halv størrelse (1/2); Niende størrelse (1/9); Kvart størrelse (1/4); Sjettedels størrelse (1/6); Tredjedels størrelse (1/3); To tredjedels størrelse (2/3); Annet
sv: Kompatibilitet med ångbordspannans storlek: Full storlek (1/1); Halv storlek (1/2); Nionde storleken (1/9); kvartalsstorlek (1/4); Sjätte storleken (1/6); Tredje storlek (1/3); Två tredjedelars storlek (2/3); Annat
hu: Gőzölőtálca-méret kompatibilitás: Teljes méret (1/1); Fél méret (1/2); 9-ed méret (1/9); Negyed méret (1/4); 6-od méret (1/6); Harmad méret (1/3); Kétharmad méret (2/3); Egyéb
fr: Tailles des bacs gastronormes compatibles: Taille réelle (1/1); Demi-taille (1/2); Neuvième (1/9); Quart (1/4); Sixième (1/6); Troisième (1/3); Deux tiers (2/3); Autre
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea cu mărimea tăvii pentru bain-marie: Dimensiune completă (1/1); Jumătate de dimensiune (1/2); O noime (1/9); Un sfert (1/4); O șesime (1/6); O treime (1/3); Două treimi (2/3); Altele
da: Gastrobakkestørrelsekompatibilitet: Fuld størrelse (1/1); Halv størrelse (1/2); Niende størrelse (1/9); Kvart størrelse (1/4); Sjette størrelse (1/6); Tredje størrelse (1/3); Totredjedels størrelse (2/3); Andet
pt-PT: Compatibilidade de tamanho das panelas de mesa a vapor: Tamanho real (1/1); Metade do tamanho (1/2); Um nono tamanho (1/9); Um quarto do tamanho (1/4); Um sexto do tamanho (1/6); Um terço do tamanho (1/3); Dois terços do tamanho (2/3); Outro
cs: Kompatibilní velikosti nádob chafingu: Plná velikost (1/1); Poloviční (1/2); Devítinová (1/9); Čtvrtinová (1/4); Šestinové (1/6); Třetinová (1/3); Dvoutřetinová (2/3); Jiné